Washington statutes.
RCW 41.56.010

Declaration of purpose.

The intent and purpose of this chapter is to promote the continued improvement of the relationship between public employers and their employees by providing a uniform basis for implementing the right of public employees to join labor organizations of their own choosing and to be represented by such organizations in matters concerning their employment relations with public employers.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 108 s 1.]